Tennessee, session 114, SB1956.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 48, Chapter 51, Part 4, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The secretary of state shall utilize existing resources to compile and publish
a report to the general assembly on the number of nonprofit corporate registrations
administratively revoked for a violation of this title within each of the last three (3)
calendar years. The secretary shall, no later than December 31, 2026, transmit a copy
of the report to the chief clerk of the senate, the chief clerk of the house of
representatives, and the legislative librarian. Publication and transmission of the report
may be accomplished by electronic means.
(b) This section is repealed on January 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1956
011341
- 1 -